Utah statutes.
62A-1-105.   Creation of boards, divisions, and offices.
(1)  The following policymaking boards are created within the Department of
Human Services:
(a)  the Board of Aging and Adult Services; and
(b)  the Board of Juvenile Justice Services.
(2)  The following divisions are created within the Department of Human
Services:
(a)  the Division of Aging and Adult Services;
(b)  the Division of Child and Family Services;
(c)  the Division of Services for People with Disabilities;
(d)  the Division of Substance Abuse and Mental Health; and
(e)  the Division of Juvenile Justice Services.
(3)  The following offices are created within the Department of Human
Services:
(a)  the Office of Licensing;
(b)  the Office of Public Guardian; and
(c)  the Office of Recovery Services.
